District of Columbia statutes.
8-104.06

Penalties.

(a)

A violation of this subchapter shall be a civil infraction for purposes of Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.] (“Civil Infractions Act”). Civil fines, civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this subchapter, or the rules issued under authority of this subchapter, pursuant to the Civil Infractions Act. Adjudication of any infractions shall be pursuant to the Civil Infractions Act.

(b)

A person or retail establishment who violates this subchapter, or a rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this subchapter, shall be subject to the following penalties:

(1)

Violations shall be a class 4 infraction under the schedule of fines in section 3201 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (16 DCMR § 3201), pursuant to the Civil Infractions Act.

(2)

In lieu of a penalty, the Mayor may issue a written warning notice that a violation has occurred.

(c)

The Department may charge reasonable fees to cover costs associated with the implementation of this subchapter.

(d)

Revenues collected pursuant to this subchapter shall be deposited in the Anacostia River Clean Up and Protection Fund, established in subchapter I-A of this title [§ 8-102.01 et seq.].

History

Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-262, § 206, 60 DCR 1300